Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.190

Official bonds required.

Every administrator, employee or other person occupying a position of trust under any marketing order and every member actually handling or drawing upon funds shall give a bond in such penal amount as may be required by the affected commission or by the order, the premium for which bond or bonds shall be paid by the commission.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.66.190. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 19.]